Maine, session 132, LD900.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17806, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 635, Pt. NN, §1,
is further amended to read:
A. Except as provided in paragraphs A‑1, A‑2 and, A‑3 and A-4, whenever there is a
percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index from July 1st to June 30th, the board
shall automatically make an equal percentage increase in retirement benefits, beginning
in September, up to a maximum annual increase of 3%. Beginning July 1, 2028,
whenever there is a percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index from July 1st to
June 30th, the board shall automatically make an equal percentage increase in
retirement benefits, beginning in September, up to a maximum annual increase of 5%.
Effective July 1, 2011, the increase applies to that portion of the retirement benefit up
to $20,000, which and that amount must be indexed in subsequent years by the same
percentage adjustments granted under this section. Effective July 1, 2022, the increase
applies to that portion of the retirement benefit up to $24,186.25, which and that
amount must be indexed in subsequent years by the same percentage adjustments
granted under this section. Effective July 1, 2026, the increase applies to that portion
of the retirement benefit up to $40,000. Effective July 1, 2028, the increase applies to
that portion of the retirement benefit up to $50,000, and that amount must be indexed
in subsequent years by the same percentage adjustments granted under this section.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §17806, sub-§1, ¶A-4 is enacted to read:
A-4. For cost-of-living adjustments awarded in fiscal year 2026-27 only, whenever
there is a percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index from July 1st to June 30th,
the board shall automatically make an equal percentage increase in retirement benefits,
beginning in September, up to a maximum annual increase of 4%. The increase applies
to that portion of the retirement benefit that would otherwise be subject to an increase
under paragraph A.